Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2205
Compact commissioner; duties.

A deputy commissioner of education as designated by the Commissioner of Education shall serve as the compact commissioner and shall be responsible for administering the state's participation in the Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity for Military Children.

Laws 2011, LB575, § 5;

Laws 2015, LB525, § 32.